Hawaii statutes.
§145-7 Credit for loss or dumping. No
claim or credit in any payment, accounting, or settlement shall be made or
taken against a producer by any commission merchant, dealer, processor, or
retail merchant for any damage to, or loss, dumping, or disposal, of any farm
produce unless such claim or credit has been agreed to in writing by the
producer and the licensee has secured and is in possession of a certificate
issued by an agent of the department of agriculture showing that the produce
has no commercial value, or a certificate issued by a county or state health
officer, or other duly authorized officer, stating that the produce has been
destroyed or otherwise disposed of as unfit for human consumption. [L 1951, c
74, pt of §1; RL 1955, §23-7; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §2;
HRS §145-7; am L 1972, c 39, §5]

Case Notes

Cited: 46 H. 292,
307, 380 P.2d 156.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next